Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.02.120

Effective date of reclassification and reorganization.

Upon the filing of the certified copy of the resolution with the secretary of state, the county auditor shall issue certificates of election to the successful candidates for the offices under the plan of government for which a majority of the votes were cast, and upon the issuance of such certificates, such city or town shall become a noncharter code city governed under the plan of government chosen by the voters, under the provisions of this title and with the powers conferred by this title.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.02.120.]